Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 3 REGISTRATION OF SECURITIES AND EXEMPTIONS
11-51-308. Exempt transactions.

The following transactions are exempted from sections 11-51-301 and 11-51-305:

Any isolated nonissuer transaction, whether or not effected through a broker-dealer;

Any nonissuer distribution of an outstanding security:

If a recognized securities manual contains the name of the issuer, the names of the issuer's officers and directors, a balance sheet of the issuer as of a date within the eighteen-month period immediately preceding the date of the distribution, and a profit and loss statement for either the fiscal year preceding that date or the most recent year of operations;

If the security has a fixed maturity or a fixed interest or dividend provision and there has been no default by the issuer during the current fiscal year or within the three preceding fiscal years, or during the existence of the issuer and any predecessors if less than three years, in the payment of principal, interest, or dividend on any security of the issuer;

If any class of securities of the issuer is registered under section 12 of the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934";

If the issuer is an investment company registered under the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940"; or

If the issuer of the security has filed and maintained with the securities commissioner, for not less than ninety days next preceding the transaction, such information as the securities commissioner may specify by rule and has paid an exemption fee to be determined and collected as provided in section 11-51-707;

Any nonissuer transaction effected by or through a licensed broker-dealer pursuant to an unsolicited order or offer to buy, if either the confirmation of the transaction delivered to the customer clearly states that the transaction was unsolicited or the broker-dealer obtains a written acknowledgment signed by the customer that the transaction was unsolicited and a copy of the confirmation or the acknowledgment is preserved by the broker-dealer for such period as the securities commissioner may, by rule, require;

Any transaction between the issuer or other person on whose behalf the offering is made and an underwriter or among underwriters;

Any transaction in a bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a mortgage, security interest, or deed of trust or by an agreement for the sale of real estate or chattels, if the entire mortgage, security interest, deed of trust, or agreement together with all the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness secured thereby is offered and sold as a unit;

Any transaction by an executor, administrator, sheriff, marshal, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, guardian, or conservator;

Any transaction executed by a bona fide pledgee without any purpose of evading the provisions of this article;

Any offer or sale to a financial or institutional investor or to a broker-dealer, whether the purchaser is acting for itself or in some fiduciary capacity;

Any transaction not involving any public offering;

Any transaction pursuant to an offering of securities directed by the offeror to not more than twenty persons (other than those designated in paragraph (h) of this subsection (1)) in this state and sold to not more than ten buyers (other than those designated in paragraph (h) of this subsection (1)) in this state during any period of twelve consecutive months, whether or not the offeror or any of the offerees or buyers is then present in this state, if:

The seller reasonably believes that all the buyers in this state (other than those designated in paragraph (h) of this subsection (1)) are purchasing for investment; and

No commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective buyer in this state (other than those designated in paragraph (h) of this subsection (1)) except to a licensed broker-dealer or a licensed sales representative;

Any offer or sale of a preorganization certificate or subscription if no commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective subscriber, if the number of subscribers does not exceed twenty-five, and if no payment is made by any subscriber;

Any transaction pursuant to an offer to existing security holders of the issuer, including persons who at the time of the transaction are holders of convertible securities, nontransferable warrants, or transferable warrants exercisable within not more than ninety days of their issuance, if no commission or other remuneration (other than a standby commission) is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any security holder in this state except to a licensed or exempt broker-dealer;

A transaction involving an offer to sell, but not a sale, of a security if:

A registration or offering statement or similar document as required under the federal "Securities Act of 1933" has been filed with the securities and exchange commission, but is not effective;

A registration statement, if required, has been filed under section 11-51-303, but is not effective; and

No stop order of which the offeror is aware has been entered by the securities commissioner or the securities and exchange commission;

A transaction involving an offer to sell, but not a sale, of a security if:

A registration statement has been filed under section 11-51-304 but is not effective; and

No stop order of which the offeror is aware has been entered by the securities commissioner;

A transaction described in section 11-51-201 (13)(g); and

Any offer or sale of a security in compliance with an exemption from registration with the securities and exchange commission under section 3(b)(1) or 4(a)(2) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", as amended, 15 U.S.C. secs. 77c (b)(1) and 77d (a)(2), pursuant to regulations adopted in accordance with the federal act by the securities and exchange commission; except that an offer or sale of a security in compliance with an exemption from registration with the securities and exchange commission under regulation A, codified at 17 CFR 230.251 to 17 CFR 230.263 and adopted pursuant to section 3(b) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", as amended, is not exempted under this section. The issuer shall file with the securities commissioner a notification of exemption, in a form prescribed by the securities commissioner, and pay an exemption fee to be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 717, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(p) amended, (SB 15-104), ch. 177, p. 578, § 5, effective May 11; (1)(p) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 944, § 14, effective August 5.

11-51-308.5. Crowdfunding - intrastate offering of securities - online intermediaries - rules - fees - short title - legislative declaration.

Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Crowdfunding Act".

Legislative declaration. The general assembly hereby:

Finds that:

Start-up companies play a critical role in expanding economic opportunities, creating new jobs, and generating revenues; and

Lack of access to capital is an obstacle to starting and expanding small business, inhibits job growth, and has negatively affected the state's economy;

Determines that:

The costs and complexities of state securities registration can outweigh the benefits to Colorado businesses seeking to raise capital by small securities offerings;

The use of crowdfunding, or raising money online through small contributions from a large number of investors, is presently restricted by our state securities laws; and

Crowdfunding allows small companies to access the capital they need to start or expand businesses; and

Declares that:

In compliance with exemptions from federal law, the exemption provided by this section applies only if:

The investor is a Colorado resident or is an entity formed pursuant to Colorado laws;

The issuer of the securities is an entity formed pursuant to Colorado laws and doing business in Colorado; and

The issuer intends to use and uses at least eighty percent of the proceeds of the sale of securities in Colorado; and

Creating a Colorado crowdfunding option, with limitations to protect investors, will enable Colorado businesses to obtain capital, democratize venture capital formation, and facilitate investment by Colorado residents in Colorado start-ups, thereby promoting the formation and growth of local companies and the accompanying job creation.

Exemption. If an offer or sale of a security by an issuer made after the securities commissioner initially promulgates rules to implement this section is conducted in accordance with all the following requirements and those contained in the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the transaction is exempt from section 11-51-301:

The issuer of the security must be a business entity organized pursuant to the laws of Colorado and authorized to do business in Colorado and meet all of the following requirements:

The securities must meet the requirements of the federal exemption for intrastate offerings in section 3 (a)(11) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", 15 U.S.C. sec. 77c (a)(11), and the securities and exchange commission's rule 147 adopted pursuant to said act, 17 CFR 230.147, for an intrastate offering being conducted in Colorado. Prior to any sale pursuant to this exemption, the issuer shall obtain documentary evidence from each prospective purchaser that provides the seller with a reasonable basis to believe that the purchaser meets the requirements of subsection (d) of the securities and exchange commission's rule 147, 17 CFR 230.147 (d).

The sum of all cash and other consideration to be received for all sales of the security pursuant to the exemption provided by this section must not exceed one million dollars during any twelve-month period; except that, if before offering and selling the securities, the issuer submits audited financial statements regarding the issuer to the securities commissioner, the sum must not exceed two million dollars.

The aggregate amount sold to any purchaser during the twelve-month period preceding the date of the sale must not exceed five thousand dollars unless the purchaser is an accredited investor as defined by the securities and exchange commission's rule 501 of Regulation D, 17 CFR 230.501.

Unless waived or modified by written consent by the securities commissioner, not less than ten days before the commencement of an offering of securities pursuant to the exemption provided by this section, the issuer must do all the following:

Make a notice filing with the securities commissioner on a form prescribed by the securities commissioner, including a consent to service of process in such form as the securities commissioner may require;

Pay the fee established by the securities commissioner;

Provide the securities commissioner with a copy of the disclosure document to be provided to prospective purchasers pursuant to subparagraph (X) of this paragraph (a);

Provide the securities commissioner with a copy of an escrow agreement with a depository institution authorized to do business in Colorado in which the issuer will deposit the purchaser's funds or cause the purchaser's funds to be deposited and that the issuer may access only as provided in sub-subparagraph (F) of this subparagraph (IV). The depository institution in which the purchaser funds are deposited shall act only at the direction of the party establishing the escrow agreement and does not have any duty or liability, contractual or otherwise, to any purchaser or other person. A purchaser may cancel the purchaser's commitment to invest if the minimum amount established pursuant to sub-subparagraph (F) of this subparagraph (IV) is not raised before the time stated in the escrow agreement.

Maintain all records with respect to any offering conducted pursuant to the exemption provided by this section as the securities commissioner may by rule require; and

Establish both a minimum and a maximum offering amount, and deposit all funds raised from purchasers pursuant to the exemption provided by this section into an escrow account established pursuant to sub-subparagraph (D) of this subparagraph (IV); except that, once the minimum offering amount has been raised and deposited in the escrow account, the issuer may terminate the escrow arrangement. The minimum established must be not less than one-half of the maximum offering amount. The maximum amount must not exceed the limitations set forth in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a). The issuer shall not access the escrow funds until the aggregate funds raised from all purchasers equals or exceeds the minimum amount. The issuer shall use all funds in accordance with representations made to purchasers.

The issuer must not be, either before or as a result of the offering, an investment company, as defined in section 3 of the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940", 15 U.S.C. sec. 80a-3, an entity that would be an investment company but for the exclusions provided in section 3 (c) of the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940", 15 U.S.C. sec. 80a-3 (c), or subject to the reporting requirements of section 13 or 15 (d) of the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", 15 U.S.C. sec. 78m or 78o (d).

The issuer shall inform all prospective purchasers of securities offered pursuant to the exemption provided by this section, in plain, nontechnical language using words with common and everyday meaning that are understandable to the average reader, that the securities have not been registered pursuant to federal or state securities law and that the securities are subject to limitations on resale. The issuer shall display the following legend conspicuously on the cover page of the disclosure document required by subparagraph (X) of this paragraph (a):

The issuer shall require each purchaser to certify in writing or electronically as follows:

The issuer must obtain from each purchaser of a security offered pursuant to the exemption provided by this section evidence that the purchaser is a resident of Colorado or, if the purchaser is an entity, is organized pursuant to the laws of Colorado and, if applicable, is an accredited investor.

All payments for purchase of securities offered pursuant to the exemption provided by this section must be directed to and held by the depository institution specified in sub-subparagraph (D) of subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (a). The securities commissioner may request from the depository institution information necessary to ensure compliance with this section. This information is not a public record and is not available for public inspection.

The issuer of securities offered pursuant to the exemption provided by this section must provide a disclosure document to each prospective purchaser at the time the offer of securities is made to the prospective purchaser that contains the information that the securities commissioner requires by rule.

All sales pursuant to an offering or single plan of financing pursuant to the exemption provided by this section must meet all of the terms and conditions of this section. The exemption provided by this section shall not be used in conjunction with any other exemption pursuant to section 11-51-307, 11-51-308, or 11-51-309 during the immediately preceding twelve-month period.

The exemption provided by this section is not available if an issuer or a person affiliated with the issuer or offering is subject to disqualification established by the securities commissioner by rule or contained in the securities and exchange commission's rule 506 (d) adopted pursuant to the federal "Securities Act of 1933", 17 CFR 230.506 (d).

An issuer of a security pursuant to this section shall provide, free of charge, a quarterly report to the issuer's owners. An issuer may satisfy the reporting requirement of this subparagraph (XIII) by making the information available on a website operated by an online intermediary if the information is made available within forty-five days after the end of each fiscal quarter and remains available until the succeeding quarterly report is issued. An issuer shall file each quarterly report required pursuant to this subparagraph (XIII) with the division and, if the quarterly report is made available on a website operated by an online intermediary, the issuer shall also provide a written copy of the report to any owner upon request. The report must contain all the following:

Compensation received by each director and executive officer, including cash compensation earned since the previous report and on an annual basis and any bonuses, stock options, other rights to receive securities of the issuer or any affiliate of the issuer, or other compensation received; and

An analysis by management of the issuer of the business operations and financial condition of the issuer.

The issuer may distribute a notice within Colorado that is limited to a statement that the issuer is conducting an offering and that includes:

The name of the online intermediary, sales representative, or licensed broker-dealer through which the offering is being conducted; and

A link directing the potential investor to the online intermediary's or broker-dealer's website.

An issuer may make an offering pursuant to the exemption provided by this section through:

A broker-dealer that is licensed pursuant to part 4 of this article with its principal place of business in Colorado;

A sales representative that is licensed pursuant to part 4 of this article; or

An online intermediary that meets the requirements of paragraph (c) of this subsection (3).

Before acting as an online intermediary for an offering pursuant to the exemption provided by this section, the online intermediary must file a statement with the securities commissioner, accompanied by the filing fee established by the securities commissioner, that includes all the following:

That the online intermediary consents to service of process in Colorado pursuant to section 11-51-706;

That the online intermediary will provide information with respect to the offer of securities in Colorado only pursuant to the exemption provided by this section;

The identity and location of, and contact information for, the online intermediary, including the names and physical addresses of the officers, directors, managers, partners, and other persons who control the business decisions of the online intermediary;

A statement that sets forth any changes to the information contained in the original or any subsequently filed statement required by this subparagraph (I); and

Notice of its intention to act as online intermediary for an offering, which statement must be on such form as the securities commissioner requires.

An online intermediary shall maintain records of all offers of securities effected through its website and shall provide ready access to the records to the division, upon request. The records of an online intermediary required pursuant to this subparagraph (II) are subject to the reasonable periodic, special, or other examination or inspection by a representative of the securities commissioner, in or outside Colorado, as the securities commissioner considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of purchasers. An examination or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The securities commissioner may copy, and remove for examination or inspection copies of, all records that the securities commissioner reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the examination or inspection. The securities commissioner may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an examination or inspection pursuant to this subparagraph (II). The securities commissioner may by rule require an online intermediary to:

File with the securities commissioner specified financial and other information;

Make and maintain specified records and preserve such records for five years or such other period as may be specified by rule; and

Establish written supervisory procedures and a system for applying such procedures that is reasonably expected to prevent and detect violations of this article.

An online intermediary shall:

Limit its offer of securities pursuant to the exemption provided by this section to only Colorado residents as that term is defined in subsection (d) of the securities and exchange commission's rule 147, 17 CFR 230.147 (d);

Not hold a financial interest in any issuer or be affiliated with or under common control with an issuer whose securities appear on any website maintained for the offer of securities by the online intermediary; and

Not be an owner of any issuer offering securities pursuant to the exemption provided by this section.

An online intermediary shall not be compensated based on the amount of securities sold. The fee that an online intermediary may charge an issuer for an offering of securities pursuant to the exemption provided by this section must be either:

A fixed amount for each offering;

A variable amount based on the length of time that the securities are offered by the online intermediary; or

A combination of the fixed and variable amounts.

An online intermediary shall not identify, promote, or otherwise refer to any individual security offered by it in any advertising for or on behalf of the online intermediary.

An online intermediary shall not engage in any other activities that the securities commissioner, by rule, determines are prohibited by the online intermediary.

An online intermediary and a director, executive officer, general partner, managing member, or other person with management authority over the online intermediary must not have been subject to any conviction, order, judgment, decree, or other action that would disqualify an issuer from claiming an exemption pursuant to rule 506 (a) to (d) adopted by the securities exchange commission pursuant to the federal "Securities Act of 1933", 17 CFR 230.506 (a) to (d).

Rules. The securities commissioner may adopt rules to:

Implement or enforce this section or provide exceptions or waivers to the requirements of this section; or

Conform or add to the requirements of this section to accommodate the requirements of federal law applicable to the offer or sale of a security by an issuer under this section.

THESE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED WITH, APPROVED BY, OR RECOMMENDED BY ANY FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCY. IN MAKING AN INVESTMENT DECISION, PURCHASERS MUST RELY ON THEIR OWN EXAMINATION OF THE ISSUER AND THE TERMS OF THE OFFERING, INCLUDING THE MERITS AND RISKS INVOLVED. THESE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN RECOMMENDED BY ANY FEDERAL OR STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION OR DIVISION OR OTHER REGULATORY AUTHORITY. FURTHERMORE, THE FOREGOING AUTHORITIES HAVE NOT CONFIRMED THE ACCURACY OR DETERMINED THE ADEQUACY OF THIS DOCUMENT. ANY REPRESENTATION TO THE CONTRARY IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE. THESE SECURITIES ARE SUBJECT TO RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFERABILITY AND RESALE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED OR RESOLD EXCEPT AS PERMITTED BY SUBSECTION (e) OF SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION RULE 147, 17 CFR 230.147 (e), AS PROMULGATED PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL "SECURITIES ACT OF 1933", AS AMENDED, AND THE APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS, PURSUANT TO REGISTRATION OR EXEMPTION THEREFROM. INVESTORS SHOULD BE AWARE THAT THEY WILL BE REQUIRED TO BEAR THE FINANCIAL RISKS OF THIS INVESTMENT FOR AN INDEFINITE PERIOD OF TIME.

I understand and acknowledge that I am investing in a high-risk, speculative business venture. I may lose all of my investment, or under some circumstances more than my investment, and I can afford this loss. This offering has not been reviewed or approved by any state or federal securities commission or division or other regulatory authority and no such person or authority has confirmed the accuracy or determined the adequacy of any disclosure made to me relating to this offering. The securities I am acquiring in this offering cannot be readily sold, are illiquid, there is no ready market for the sale of such securities, it may be difficult or impossible for me to sell or otherwise dispose of this investment, and, accordingly, I may be required to hold this investment indefinitely. I may be subject to tax on my share of the taxable income and losses of the company, whether or not I have sold or otherwise disposed of my investment or received any dividends or other distributions from the company.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1246), ch. 98, p. 279, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(3)(a)(IV)(D), (3)(a)(IV)(F), and (3)(a)(IX) amended, (HB 16-1049), ch. 3, p. 5, § 1, effective March 9.

11-51-308.7. Colorado digital token act - legislative declaration - exemptions - definitions - rules.

Short title. The short title of this section is the "Colorado Digital Token Act".

Legislative declaration. The general assembly:

Finds that:

Cryptoeconomic systems, which are protocols that govern the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services in a decentralized digital economy, can be an important component of blockchain technology;

Blockchain technology has the potential to create new forms of decentralized "Web 3.0" platforms and applications that have advantages over the current centralized internet platforms and applications;

Colorado has become a hub for companies and entrepreneurs that seek to utilize cryptoeconomic systems to power blockchain technology-based business models;

Companies that seek to utilize cryptoeconomic systems face regulatory uncertainty that the issuance, sale, and purchase of digital tokens that have a primarily consumptive purpose may be prohibited under this article 51;

Crowdfunding consumer goods platforms provide a means for companies and entrepreneurs to acquire growth capital and customers by preselling the right to receive consumer goods before the goods are ready to be sold or used, in addition to providing a marketplace for the purchase and sale of consumer goods that are ready for use;

Companies using cryptoeconomic systems that seek to acquire growth capital and customers by preselling digital tokens that have a primarily consumptive purpose face regulatory uncertainty that the offer, sale, or transfer of digital tokens may be prohibited under this article 51; and

Companies that seek to create a marketplace to effect the purchase, sale, or transfer of digital tokens that have a primarily consumptive purpose face regulatory uncertainty that effecting or attempting to effect the purchase, sale, or transfer of a digital token may be prohibited under this article 51;

Determines that:

The costs and complexities of state securities registration can outweigh the benefits to Colorado businesses using cryptoeconomic systems that seek to raise growth capital and create new decentralized internet platforms and applications by offering the sale or transfer of digital tokens that have a primarily consumptive purpose;

Companies that seek to issue or effect the purchase, sale, or transfer of digital tokens that have a primarily consumptive purpose face regulatory uncertainty under Colorado's securities laws; and

The issuance, sale, purchase, and transfer of digital tokens that have a primarily consumptive purpose allow companies using cryptoeconomic systems to access the growth capital and build the necessary network of participants they need to grow and expand their businesses; and

Declares that creating a Colorado digital token act, with limitations to protect consumers, will enable Colorado businesses that use cryptoeconomic systems to obtain growth capital to help grow and expand their businesses, thereby promoting the formation and growth of local companies and the accompanying job creation and helping make Colorado a hub for companies that are building new forms of decentralized "Web 3.0" platforms and applications.

Exemptions.

Issuer exemption. An offer or sale of a digital token is exempt from section 11-51-301 if:

The offer or sale:

Occurs after the securities commissioner initially promulgates rules to implement this section; and

Complies with all of the requirements of this subsection (3)(a) and those contained in the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section;

The issuer of the digital token files a notice of intent with the securities commissioner as specified in subsection (3)(c) of this section;

The primary purpose of the digital token is a consumptive purpose;

The issuer of the digital token markets the digital token to be used for a consumptive purpose and does not market the digital token to be used for a speculative or investment purpose; and

Either the consumptive purpose of the digital token is available at the time of sale or all of the following conditions are met:

The consumptive purpose of the digital token is available within one hundred eighty days after the time of sale or transfer of the digital token;

The initial buyer is prohibited from reselling or transferring the digital token until the consumptive purpose of the digital token is available; and

The initial buyer provides a knowing and clear acknowledgment that the initial buyer is purchasing the digital token with the primary intent to use the digital token for a consumptive purpose and not for a speculative or investment purpose.

Licensing exemption. A person that engages in the business of effecting or attempting to effect the purchase, sale, or transfer of a digital token is exempt from section 11-51-401 if:

The person:

Effects or attempts to effect the purchase, sale, or transfer after the securities commissioner initially promulgates rules to implement this section; and

Complies with all of the requirements of this subsection (3)(b) and those contained in the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section;

The person files a notice of intent with the securities commissioner as specified in subsection (3)(c) of this section;

The digital token can be used for a consumptive purpose at the time the person effects the purchase, sale, or transfer of the digital token; and

The person takes reasonably prompt action to cease effecting the purchase, sale, or transfer of any digital token that does not conform to the requirements of this subsection (3)(b).

An issuer of a digital token and a person that is engaged in the business of effecting or attempting to effect the purchase, sale, or transfer of a digital token each shall file or cause to be filed a notice of intent with the securities commissioner before the issuer or other person may qualify for an exemption under this section. The securities commissioner shall make a form available for this purpose on the division of securities' website. If the information contained on the notice required by this subsection (3)(c) becomes inaccurate in any material respect for any reason, the issuer or other person shall file an amendment to the notice in writing with the securities commissioner within thirty days.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 3, the securities commissioner may enter into agreements with federal, state, or foreign regulators to allow digital tokens issued, purchased, sold, or transferred in this state to be issued, purchased, sold, or transferred in another jurisdiction and any digital tokens issued, purchased, sold, or transferred in another jurisdiction to be issued, purchased, sold, or transferred in this state.

Definitions. As used in this section:

"Consumptive purpose" means to provide or receive goods, services, or content, including access to goods, services, or content.

"Digital token" means a digital unit that is:

Created:

In response to the verification or collection of a specified number of transactions relating to a digital ledger or database;

By deploying computer code to a blockchain network that allows for the creation of digital tokens or other units; or

Using any combination of the methods specified in subsections (4)(b)(I)(A) and (4)(b)(I)(B) of this section;

Recorded in a digital ledger or database that is chronological, consensus-based, decentralized, and mathematically verified in nature, especially relating to the supply of units and their distribution; and

Capable of being traded or transferred between persons without an intermediary or custodian of value.

Rules. The securities commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, to enforce this section, or to provide exemptions or waivers to the requirements of this section.

Safe harbor. No presumption shall arise that an issuer of any digital token or other cryptocurrency, or any person that effects the purchase, sale, or transfer of any digital token or other cryptocurrency, has violated this article 51 solely by reason of the person's participation in the issuance, purchase, sale, or transfer of the digital token or other cryptocurrency if the person does not meet the requirements specified in subsection (3)(a) or (3)(b) of this section. No presumption shall arise that any issuer's securities offering permitted under this article 51 will be integrated with any issuer's digital token offering permitted under this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-023), ch. 12, p. 49, § 1, effective August 2.

11-51-309. Discretionary exemptions.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order and subject to such terms and conditions as prescribed therein, from time to time add any securities to the securities exempted in section 11-51-307 or add any transactions to the transactions exempted in section 11-51-308, if the securities commissioner finds that the application of sections 11-51-301 and 11-51-305 to such securities or transactions is not necessary in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 719, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-113 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-310. Denial or revocation of exemptions.

The securities commissioner may, by order, deny or revoke the exemption specified in section 11-51-307 (1)(g) with respect to a specific security or transaction if the securities commissioner finds that such order is necessary in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

The securities commissioner may, by summary order under section 11-51-606 (3)(b), summarily suspend the exemption specified in section 11-51-307 (1)(g) as to a specific security or issuer pending final determination of any proceeding under this subsection (1).

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, deny or revoke any exemption specified in section 11-51-308 (1)(i), (1)(j), and (1)(p) with respect to a specific security, transaction, issuer, or class of persons if the issuer, any of its predecessors, or any of the issuer's directors, officers, general partners, beneficial owners of ten percent or more of any class of its equity securities, or any of its promoters then presently connected with the issuer in any capacity has been convicted within ten years of any felony in connection with the purchase or sale of any security. Such ten years shall be any ten years prior to any offer or sale of a security for which such exemption would otherwise be available.

No order under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may operate retroactively. No person may be considered to have violated section 11-51-301 or 11-51-305 by reason of any offer or sale effected after the entry of an order under subsection (1) or (2) of this section if that person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the order.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 720, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1839, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-113 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-311. Coordination of exemptions.

In furtherance of the policy stated in section 11-51-101 (3), the exemptions under sections 11-51-307 to 11-51-309 shall be coordinated with exemptions for securities and transactions under the federal "Securities Act of 1933" so that an offering registered under the federal "Securities Act of 1933" shall be subject to registration by filing under this article in the absence of an exemption under this article and so that an offering exempt from registration under the federal "Securities Act of 1933", other than pursuant to the exemption for intrastate offerings, shall also be exempt from registration under this article. The securities commissioner shall make, amend, and rescind rules in order to effectuate such policy. Nothing in this section shall limit the powers or actions of the securities commissioner to make, amend, and rescind rules with regard to exemptions provided by sections 11-51-307 and 11-51-308 or added by section 11-51-309 but not contained in the federal "Securities Act of 1933" or rules and regulations thereunder.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 720, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-113 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Act of 1933", see Pub.L. 73-22, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.